Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,158
Driving through safety zone; prohibited.

The driver of a vehicle shall not at any time drive through or within a safety zone.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 48;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-648;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 254.